Hawaii statutes.
§132-12 Court aid. Each county fire
chief may invoke the aid of any court of competent jurisdiction to enforce any
order or action made or taken by the fire chief in pursuance of law. [L 1917, c
115, pt of §49; RL 1925, pt of §3463; RL 1935, pt of §6839; am L 1939, c 239,
§1(20); RL 1945, §8537; RL 1955, §184-14; am L 1965, c 96, §127; HRS §132-14;
am and ren L 1978, c 241, §2(15); gen ch 1985; am L 1993, c 6, §7]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next